 
The Alpha Manual

                                               version: 8.1a5
                                               created: 07/24/1996 {10:12:29 PM}
                                           last update: 05/23/2006 {11:18:14 AM}


	Copyright © 1990-2006 Pete Keleher. All Rights Reserved
 
The Tcl code is copyright its respective authors

	Legal notice

The Author(s) of this product are in no way liable for any direct or indirect
damage caused by the product.

You may freely copy and distribute Alpha, but please bear in mind that Alpha
is Shareware.  If you decide to keep it, please <<register>> your copy.  See
the file "license.terms" for information on usage and redistribution of this
software, and for a DISCLAIMER OF ALL WARRANTIES.


	A few quick notes about AlphaTcl/8/X/tk documentation: 

(1) The manual is always being updated, and is (always) about 90% finished.
Other parts of the documentation still need a major overhaul.

(2) In this file, we make many references to the "Config > Preferences"
submenu.  In many cases the leading "Config" is left out of the menu
directions, because we get very tired of typing that very long string, so note
that

    "Prefs > Interface > Appearance"

is really just a shorthand for

    "Config > Preferences > Interface Preferences > Appearance"

where "Appearance" refers to a particular pane of that dialog.

If there is possible confusion with the "Config > Mode Prefs" submenu, then
we'll type the whole string for you.

(3) In many cases, there is a handy hyperlink looking something like this:

Preferences: Appearance

in a section which makes references to the preferences found in that
particular dialog -- clicking on this hyperlink with your mouse will open the
preferences dialog for you.  (The dialog that you see is an abbreviated
version of

Preferences: InterfacePreferences

which, as you might notice, often takes longer to appear.)

Any changes that you make to the various settings will be saved between
editing sessions.

(4) In this file, as in most Help documents, 'Alpha' refers to the entire
family of applications using the AlphaTcl library, including all of Alpha8,
AlphaX, and Alphatk.  Alpha7 is the proud ancestor of these applications, but
has since been retired -- 7.6 was the final release in the 7.x series, and all
future development work is now devoted to this next (current!)  generation of
Text editors.


	  	Table Of Contents

"# Introduction"
"#   How to navigate the documentation"
"#   Differences between 'Alpha' and 'AlphaTcl'"
"#   Differences between 'Alpha' and 'Alphatk'"

"# Alpha's Menus"
"#   File"
"#   Edit"
"#   Text"
"#   Search"
"#   Utils"
"#   Config"
"#   Windows (an icon with three windows)"
"# Basic editing"
"#   Help"
"#   Moving the Cursor"
"#   Selecting Text"
"#   Deleting Text"
"#   Twiddle, Shifting Text"
"#   The Numeric Keypad"
"#   Drag and Drop editing"
"#   Rectangular Editing"
"# Fill Routines"
"#   Fill Paragraph"
"#   Wrap Paragraph"
"#   Word Breaking"
"# Keyboard Shortcuts"
"# International Users"
"# Undo + Redo"
"# Text Wrapping"
"# Indentation"

"# User interface details"
"#   Horizontal scrollbar"
"#   Dynamic menus"
"#   Tear-off menus"
"#   Status bar"
"#   Funcs menu"
"#   Marks menu"
"#   Icons"
"#   Title bar"
"#   Split-pane bar"
"#   Iconified (minimized) windows"
"#   Contextual Menu"
"#   Dialogs"
"# Tiling windows"
"#   Vertically"
"#   Horizontally"
"#   Unequal Vert and Unequal Hor"
"# File formats"
"#   State pop-up menu"
"#   Format pop-up menu"
"#   File encodings"
"#   Open file dialog"
"#   Paragraph format"
"# Helper Applications"
"#   Unix Issues"
"# Spell Checking"
"# Command-clicking"
"# Command-Double-Clicking"
"# Search and Replace"
"#   Incremental Searches"
"#   Browser Windows"

"# Modes"
"#   Initial Mode Selection"
"#   Changing Active Window Modes"
"# Alpha's Preferences"
"#   Default Prefs Folder"
"#   User-Defined Prefs Folder"
"#   Upgrading from 7.x"
"#   Global and mode preferences"
"#   Coloring"
"# Packages"
"# Menus and Features"
"# Electrics - automatic typing by Alpha"
"#   Electric completions"
"#   Electric expansions"
"#   Special keys dialog"
"# Regular Expressions"
"# File Patterns"
"# Marks"
"# File Comparison"
"# Backups"
"#   Auto saving"
"# Tags"
"# Calculator"

"# Unicode and Encodings"
"#   Editing files with various encodings"
"#   Saving in different encodings"
"#   Specifying encodings"
"#   Sourcing files"

"# The Command Line"
"#   AlphaX/Alphatk support"
"#   Alphatk support"
"# Using Alpha as a Helper Application"

"# Installing New Packages"
"#   Where to find new packages"
"#   What is already installed?"
"#   Installing"
"#   If something goes wrong"
"# Uninstalling Packages"
"# User Defined Keyboard Shortcuts"
"# Changing Alpha's behavior"
"# AlphaTcl-Developers mailing list"

"# Acknowledgments"
"# Copyright, Credits"


	  	Introduction


Alpha is a very powerful, multi-purpose text editor.

A central concept in Alpha is that of "Modes".  A mode is a configuration of
features tailor-made for a specific editing task, and Alpha automatically
enters the appropriate mode for the sort of document being edited.  For
example, in HTML mode there are special menus with all sorts of fancy tools
for editing html documents, and the text is automatically colored according to
the html syntax to make it easier to read; TeX mode provides all sorts of
automatic help for tex coding, and also support for seamless communication with
a tex compiler; and so on.  Alpha has more than 50 different modes, including
most programming languages.

Alpha determines the mode from the file name extension (e.g. .html); otherwise
you can change mode manually by selecting "Config > Mode Prefs > Change Mode".
For help on mode-specific issues, consult the mode help file --- pressing
Control-Help opens the help file for the active mode.  Selecting the menu item
"Config > Mode Prefs > Describe Mode" will provide more technical information
regarding the mode.

Alpha is very customizable.  Much of Alpha's functionality is implemented in
'packages' or 'extensions'.  The "Config > Global Setup > Features" and
"Config > Mode Prefs > Features" menu items let you see which items are
installed, and lets you turn them on and off.

Preferences: Features


	  	 	How to navigate the documentation


You can quickly jump between different sections of the manual by using the
"Marks Menu" you find under the "paperclick" icon at the right top of this or
any other Help window.  Also, Alpha supports a limited form of hypertext.
Clicking on colored, underlined text executes a command associated with the
underlined text, usually taking you to other documentation, like this:

    jump to "Quick Start"

When clicking on such a hyperlink, a "bookmark" is placed at the current
cursor location.  The menu item "Search > Return To Bookmark" or its
associated keyboard shortcut will bring you back to where you started.

This manual is divided into four major sections.  The first one deals
primarily with "# Alpha's Menus", "# Basic Editing", and other textual
manipulation issues.  The second addresses some "# User interface details"
more specific to Alpha, such as file marking, window management, and 
information providers like Command-Double-Clicking.

The third section introduces "# Modes" and "# Packages", including some of the
"# Menus and Features" that are available in the AlphaTcl library.  These are
the items that sets Alpha apart from most text editors available -- many of
these features are addressed in greater detail in other Help files/windows.
Information on "# The Command Line" is also presented.  The final section
contains information on changing or extending Alpha's behavior.


	  	 	Differences between 'Alpha' and 'AlphaTcl'


The program Alpha has two parts: one compiled binary part and a big library of
scripts written in Tcl (Dr.  Ousterhout's Tool Command Language).  The binary
part handles windows, mouse movements, and all such, and then it has a
built-in Tcl interpreter which drives the second part AlphaTcl, the vast
library of Tcl scripts that provide most of Alpha's functionality.  Most
editing functions, actions taken when a menu item is selected or a key
combination is pressed, and all of Alpha's packages and extensions are
implemented in Tcl.  With this design it is easy to configure and extend Alpha
--- anybody can tweak Alpha's behavior by modifying Tcl functions, or extend
Alpha by writing a new package!

Of course, you don't have to learn Tcl to use Alpha --- Alpha is designed to
be operated through a graphical user interface, and in normal operation you
will never be confronted with Tcl.  But if you want to become a real power
user, you should consider taking a look at Tcl --- it is one of the easiest
scripting languages to learn.  Then the possibilities of customizing Alpha are
unlimited.


	  	 	Differences between 'Alpha' and 'Alphatk'


Alpha was originally implemented by Pete Keleher on MacOS, and simply used Tcl
internally as a scripting and extension language.

Alphatk emulates the Tcl commands which Alpha originally exported from C:
there are several hundred of these which are used to create windows, menus,
dialogs, and handle editing, searching etc.  All of these had to be written
from scratch.  Simultaneously, the rest of the Tcl code which had been written
over the years to make Alpha a sophisticated 'mode-aware' text editor
underwent extensive work to make it independent of the differences between
Tk's and Alpha's views of the world.  The result of that work is the
'AlphaTcl' library of code, which is now more or less shared by all versions
of Alpha and Alphatk.  The AlphaTcl library is now open source and available
on sourceforge.net

These two 'users' of the AlphaTcl library are separate products, and each has
different licensing, copyright and payment methods.  Licensing for one product
cannot be transferred to the other, see the <<register>> help for information
on registering the product you are currently using.

In this document, as in most Help files, 'Alpha' refers to whichever
application you are using.  Also, in the Windows OS there is no "Command" key,
so you'll have to translate that as "Alt" whenever you see it.


	======================================================================


	  	Alpha's Menus


This section is an explanation of Alpha's main menus, from "File" to "Windows"
(menu with the window icons).  The menu items listed here are the ones
available when no features are have been turned on by using the menu item
"Config > Global Setup > Features".  (Some of these features add new menu
items or new submenus to Alpha's main menus.)

Preferences: Features

Alpha8/X uses Ramon Felciano's Mercury MDEF to display menus.  In addition to
allowing other modifiers to be shown in the menu, this MDEF also allows
alternates, items that change depending on the state of the modifier keys.
Alternate items are tagged below by the modifier that must be pressed to
display it.

	  	 	File


  New                           New file.
  Open…                         Open file.
  Open Via Fileset… (Option)    Open a file via a fileset.
  Open Remote… (Control)        Open a file from a remote filesystem.
  Close                         Close file.
  Close All (Option)            Close all files.
  Close Float (Shift)           Close a palette.

  Save                          Save file.
  Save All (Option)             Save all files.
  Save Unmodified (Control)     Save file without changing the modification 
                                date.
  Save As…                      Prompt for name to same file under.
  Rename To… (Option)           Rename file.
  Save A Copy As… ()            Save a copy of the open window.
    
  Revert To Saved…              Revert to last saved version, 
                                  throw away undo history. 
  Revert To Backup (Option)     Revert to last backup copy, if any.
        
  File Utils >

    File Remove…                Remove a file.
    File Info…                  Display/edit info about a file.
    Text to Alpha…              Set creator of text files in a folder to Alpha.
    Show in Finder              Select the front window in the Finder.
    Convert Eols…               Convert end-of-line characters for a selected 
                                  folder into Mac, Windows, or Unix formats.
    Hex Dump…                   Display the data of a selected file in hexadecimal
                                  and ASCII format.


  Page Setup…                   Set print options.
  Print…                        Print window.
  Print All (Option)            Print all windows.

  Quit                    		Quit Alpha.


	  	 	Edit


  Undo                          Undo. 
  Redo                          Redo. 

  Cut                           Cut selection to Clipboard.
  Copy                          Copy selection to Clipboard.
  Paste                         Paste from Clipboard.
  Clear                         Delete selection.
  Zap Invisibles                 Delete all chars in file with ASCII code 
                                  < 32, except for LF, TAB and CR.

  Select All                    Select entire file.
  Select Paragraph (Option)     Select current paragraph.
  Balance                       Select text out to the next set of 
								  matching braces.
  Fold                          Collapse or reveal the current block of text 
                                (or function), for outlining. (Alphatk only).

  Tab Conversions >

    Leading Tabs To Spaces      Converts leading tabs to space runs.
    All Tabs To Spaces          Converts all tabs to space runs.

    Leading Spaces To Tabs      Converts leading space strings to tabs.
    All Spaces To Tabs          Converts all space strings to tabs.

  Indent                        Indent the current line or selection.
  Shift Left                    Shift selection left one tab.
  Shift Left Space (Option)     Shift selection left one space.
  Shift Right                   Shift selection right one tab.
  Shift Right Space (Option)    Shift selection right one space.


	  	 	Text


  Fill Paragraph                "Fill" paragraph that contains the cursor.
  Wrap Paragraph (Option)       Break lines longer than 'fillColumn' in 
                                  paragraph containing the cursor.
  Sentence Paragraph            Inserts a line break at the end of each
                                  sentence in the current paragraph
  Line To Paragraph             Convert a line to a paragraph.
  Paragraph to Line (Option)    Convert a paragraph to single line.
    
  Sort Lines                    Sort selected lines.
  Reverse Sort (Option)         Sort selected lines backwards.
  Sort Paragraphs (Shift)       Sort selected paragraphs.
  Twiddle                       Exchange characters bracketing the
								  selection point.
  Twiddle Words (Option)        Exchange words bracketing the selection point.
  Upcase Region                 Upcase all chars in region.
  Downcase Region (Option)      Downcase all chars in region.
    
  Strings >

    Insert Prefix               Prepend string 'prefixString' to every line in 
                                  selection.
    Remove Prefix (Option)      Remove prefix string from lines in selection. 
    Insert Suffix               Append string 'suffixString' to every line in 
                                  selection.
    Remove Suffix (Option)      Remove suffix string from lines in selection. 
    Set Prefix                  Change prefix string.
    Set Suffix                  Change suffix string.

  Comment Line                  Comment out line, considering mode.
  Uncomment Line (Option)       Un-comment line, considering mode.
  Comment Box                   Create a comment box around selected text.
  Uncomment Box (Option)        Remove such a comment box.
  Comment Paragraph             Comment out a paragraph.
  Uncomment Paragraph           Uncomment a paragraph.

  (See the package: comments for more information.)


	  	 	Search


  Find…                         Present a search dialog.
  Search Start (Option)         Return selection point to where the last search 
                                  started. 
  Find Again                    Search forward again with same settings.
  Find Again Backward (Option)  Search backward again with same settings.
  Find in Next File             Restart multiple-file search in next file after 
                                  stopping at a match.
  Enter Search String           Use the current selection as the search text.
  Enter Replace String (Option) Use the current selection as replace text.

  Quick Find                    Incremental search forward (grep, match words
                                  off, ignore case on). Type chars to define 
                                  string, control-w adds the current word to 
                                  the search string, control-s/r search for 
                                  the same string again.
  Quick Find Regexp (Option)    Same as Quick Find but lets you use a regular
                                  expression.
  Reverse Quick Find            Same thing in reverse.
    
  Replace                       Replace the selection.
  Replace and Find Again        Replace the selection and search again forward.
  Replace All                   Replace all of occurrences of the search string 
                                  in the rest of the file.
  Replace in Fileset (Control)  Global replace in fileset.
    
  Place Bookmark                Set a book mark at the current position, 
                                  pushing it onto a "stack".
  Return to Bookmark            Pop last bookmark from stack and go to it.
  Goto Line                     Go to specific line number.
    
  Matching Lines                Find all lines that match a regular expression 
                                  and summarize in new window. 
  Next Match                    Jump to the original text specified by the 
                                  next line in a "Batch Find" or 
                                  "Matching Lines" window.
  Goto Func                     The same as selecting an item in the Funcs menu
                                  (the one with two curly braces at the right
                                  top of the window)
  Goto File Mark                The same as selection an item in the Marks menu
                                  (the one with the M icon at the right top
                                  of the window)
  Mark Hilite                   Select text last manipulated, such as from
                                   a paste.

  Named Marks >                 Manipulating named marks in the current window.
  
    Mark File                   Mark the current window in a mode specific 
                                   way.  See "# Marks Menu" below.
    Display Named Marks         Display all marks in a new window.
    Float Named Marks           Create a 'floating' menu with all of the
                                   named marks as menu items.

    Set Named Mark…             Create a new mark in the current window.
    Remove Named Mark…          Remove a previously set mark.
    Remove All Marks            Remove all marks from the current window.

    Sort Alphabetically         Sort all Marks Menu items alphabetically.
    Sort By Position            Sort all Marks Menu items by position.

  The Pin >

    Set Pin…                    Set the "Window Pin" to the cursor location.
    Exchange Point And Pin      Move the cursor to the Pin location, setting 
                                  the Pin to the previous cursor location.
    Hilite To Pin               If no selection, highlight the regions between
                                  the cursor and the Pin, otherwise set the Pin 
                                  to the end of the selection and move the
                                  cursor to the beginning of the selection.


	  	 	Utils


  Compare >

    Windows                     Compare top two windows, sending output to
                                  a third.  Selecting a line in the third 
                                  window and hitting return (or enter) moves
                                  that line to the top of the window.
    Files…                      Same as above, but prompts for files.
    Directories…                As above, but works for entire folders. 
    
  Win Utils >

    Insert Path Name…           Prompt for a file and insert complete pathname
                                in window.
    Insert File…                Insert the text of another file.
    
  Ascii Etc >

    Quote Char                  Wait for key press and insert key.
    Key Code…                   Wait for key press and insert keycode and 
                                  modifier string suitable for creating a
                                  new keyboard shortcut.
    Key Ascii…                  Same as above, but use ascii form.
    Get Ascii…                  Display ascii code for char to right of cursor.
    Insert Ascii…               Prompt for ascii code and insert character.
        
  Calculator (Shift)            See the "Calculator Help" file.
  Tcl Shell                     Start up command-line shell that interprets Tcl 
                                  commands. The shell has a few csh-type
                                  features, such as 'ls', 'rm', etc. commands,
                                  as well as file completion with the TAB key. 
  Spellcheck Window/Selection   See help for the package: spellcheck .
  Word Count                    Count lines, words, chars in window.

  Send URL                      Send selection as URL to proper internet
                                  application.
  Cmd-Double Click              See "# Command-Double-Clicking" below.
                            
	  	 	Config


  Global Setup                  Set global environment options.

    Menus…                      Change global menus.
    Features…                   Change global features.
    Suffix Mappings…            Displays and allows editing of suffixes (really
                                  filename patterns) for all existing modes.
    Arrange Menus…              Change the order of globally activated 
                                  menus that appear in the menu bar
    Helper Applications…        Set the signature/path of applications with
                                  which Alpha interacts.
    Setup Assistant…            Opens the series of dialogs that appeared when
                                  you launched Alpha for the first time,
                                  allowing to adjust your global settings.
    Create New Mode…            Opens a series of dialogs to create a new
                                  mode that will be permanently saved.

  Preferences >                 Set global preferences.

    Interface Preferences etc.  The first three items are used to set specific
                                  global preferences.
    Package Preferences         This item opens a multi-paned dialog which
                                  contains preferences for different packages
                                  that you have already activated.  Other
                                  package might add additional submenus in
                                  this section as well.
    View Saved Settings…        Any variables or flags that you modify during
                                  the course of a session are saved to files
                                  in the system preferences folder when
                                  Alpha quits. This function shows all 
                                  such saved variables.
    Remove Saved Settings…      This function allows settings to be removed.
    Save Preferences Now        Save any preferences set during this session.
    Edit Prefs File             Put your own arbitrary startup code here. 
                                Loaded after all standard Tcl code. 
    Edit User Packages          Alpha also allows you to create a new folder
                                  in which you can add additional packages.
                            
  Mode Prefs >                  Set preferences for current mode.

    Menus and Features…         Change current mode's menus and features.
    Preferences…                Change options for current mode.
    Edit Prefs File             Edit mode-specific preferences.  Loaded 
                                  after mode entered for the first time.
    Load Prefs File               Load current mode's preferences.
    Describe mode               Describe current mode's variable settings and 
                                  keyboard shortcuts.
  List Bindings                 List all current shortcuts for the current mode.
    Change Mode…                Change the current mode.

  Packages >

    Describe A Package…         Show a description of a package.
    Read Help For A Package…    Opens the documentation for a package.
    Uninstall Some Packages…    Uninstall one or more packages.
    Install A Package…          Opens a dialog prompting for a url which
                                  contains a new package to install.
    List Packages               (Re)Create the "Installed Packages" help file.
    Rebuild Package Indices     The Alpha's index of all installed 
                                  packages.
                            
  Special Keys…                 Set keyboard shortcuts for electric features.
  Describe Binding…             Wait for a keystroke, then display the AlphaTcl
                                  procedure bound to the shortcut.
  List All Bindings             List all current keyboard shortcuts.
  List Global Bindings (Option) List all current global keyboard shortcuts.

  Redefine Colors >             See help for the package: colorPrefs .
            

	  	 	Windows (an icon with three windows)


  Zoom                          Zoom windows in and out.
  Default Size (Option)         Resize window to default size.
  Choose A Window…              Choose window to select from list
  Shrink Window…                Change the dimensions of the current window.
  Arrange Windows…              Change the dimensions of the current window
                                  and the most recent window, i.e. side by
                                  side, top and bottom, etc.

  Minimize                      Minimize the active window and bring the next
                                  forward, or (if all windows are minimized)
                                  un-minimize the active window.
  Set Font Tabs…                Change font and/or tabs for current file.
  Split Window                  Split window into two panes, or unsplit.
  Other Pane (Option)           Switch to the other pane of a split window.
  Toggle Scrollbar              Toggle the horizontal scrollbar on the
								  active window. 
  Toggle Line Numbers           Toggle the display of line number information
                                  in the left margin of the active window
                                  (Alphatk only).

	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	Basic editing


The very basics for editing text with Alpha is the same as in any other Mac
application, but Alpha has a number of keyboard shortcuts to speed up your
work, and a couple of features not found in similar applications.  See the
help file "Keyboard Shortcuts" for an extended discussion.

Emacs user will also be happy to know that many of the basic keyboard
shortcuts used in Emacs are supported by Alpha.  However, this requires that
you switch on the Emacs package.  Read more in the file "Emacs Help".

The following is a list of some of the most commonly used keyboard shortcuts
in Alpha's default setup, those that are generally not listed in any menus:


	  	 	Help

'Help'									open the "Alpha Manual" help file

Control-'Help'							open any available help for the mode
                                          of the active window.

	  	 	Moving the Cursor


Left-Arrow                              backward character
Right-Arrow                             forward character

Command-Left-Arrow                      beginning of line
Command-Right-Arrow                     end of line

Option-Left-Arrow                       backward one word
Option-Right-Arrow                      forward one word


Up-Arrow                                previous-line
Down-Arrow                              next-line

Command-Up-Arrow     or  'Home'         beginning of window
Command-Down-Arrow   or  'End'          end of window

Option-Up-Arrow      or  'Page Up'      move one page backward
Option-Down-Arrow    or  'Page Down'    move one page forward

Control-Up-Arrow                        scroll window up one line
Control-Down-Arrow                      scroll window down one line



	  	 	Selecting Text


Shift-Left-Arrow                extend selection one char left
Shift-Right-Arrow               extend selection one char right

Shift-Up-Arrow                  extend selection one line up
Shift-Down-Arrow                extend selection one line down

Shift-Option-Left-Arrow         extend selection one word left
Shift-Option-Right-Arrow        extend selection one word right

Control-H                       select next word

Shift-Command-Left-Arrow        select to beginning of line
Shift-Command-Right-Arrow       select to end of line


Command-B                       select smallest set of parentheses, braces, or 
(Balance in Text menu)          brackets that encloses the current selection

Double-Clicking                 select a word
Triple-Clicking                 select a line


Control-Double-Clicking on any type of parentheses or bracket selects from the
parentheses or bracket to its mate.  Without the control key held down, only
the intervening text is selected.


	  	 	Deleting Text


'Del'      or  Control-D        delete forward char
'Delete'                        delete backward char
Option-D                        delete forward word
Option-H   or  Option-Delete    delete backward word
Control-K                       delete to end of line

(Control-D, Option-D, Option-H, Option-Delete and Control-K are only available
after the package: emacs has been turned on.)

	  	 	Twiddle, Shifting Text


The following commands are found in the Text menu.  The keyboard shortcuts are 
not listed, because they are dependent on your keyboard layout.

Twiddle                         Exchange characters surrounding cursor.
Twiddle Words                   Exchange words surrounding cursor

Note that the characters affected by Twiddle are determined by the Interface 
preference for "Twiddle Adjusts".

Preferences: Text

Shift Left                      Shift selection left one tab.
Shift Left Space                Shift selection left one space.
Shift Right                     Shift selection right one tab.
Shift Right Space               Shift selection right one space.


	  	 	The Numeric Keypad


Alpha is able to use numeric keypad as a navigation tool.  Press Shift-Clear
(or Shift-Numlock) to turn on this feature.  The current status of Alpha's
internal "numLock" variable is indicated by the "NLCK" button in the status
bar menu.  Clicking on this button also toggles "numLock" on and off.  Click
on this hyperlink <<toggleNumLock>> to locate it.

See the "Keyboard Shortcuts # The Numeric Keypad" help file for more
information about some of the navigation tools available.

As of this writing, Alphatk has no control over the functions that are bound
to the numeric keypad keys.


	  	 	Drag and Drop editing


Alpha supports drag and drop cut, copy, clear, and paste.  To use this
feature, select some text, then move the cursor over the selected text.  The
cursor should then turn into an open hand.  Mouse down, and move the cursor to
the place you wish to paste the text.  When the mouse is released, the
highlighted text is moved to the new location.

Option-mouse dragging and dropping will always "copy" the dropped text,
leaving the original in place.  You can also drag selections between windows
and to and from other applications, including the Finder.  Dragging and
dropping between windows will always copy rather than moving (in analogy with
dragging a file from one volume to another in MacOS).  Text dragged to the
Finder is saved in a text clip file.  Text can be deleted by dragging it to
the trash can.

You can also drag any text file to an Alpha window to insert the content of
the file in the window.


	  	 	Rectangular Editing


If the Option key is pressed while the mouse is dragged, a rectangular section
of text is selected instead of the normal selection.  This rectangular
selection may extend over multiple lines, but contains only text between the
column of the drag start and the column of the drag end.  The drag cannot end
on a column or row less than the start.  This selection can be extended by
option-shift-mouse, but not dragged further.

The rectangular selection can be deleted, copied, and pasted.  This is very
useful for tables and arrays, such as in LaTeX. Usually, the operation will be
intuitive.  However, if you use proportional fonts the selection may appear
ragged.  If some of the line contain tabs, the result may not be want you
want.  Converting tabs to spaces in the desired region before attempting
rectangular selection usually fixes the problems.


	  	Fill Routines


The 'fill' and 'wrap' routines reformat text to specified line lengths.  This
is useful in two case.  First, word processors such as Microsoft Word only
insert carriage returns at the end of paragraphs.  Secondly, while typing and
inserting text into pre-existing paragraphs, the line lengths become unequal.

The 'wrap' routine handles word processor documents quickly by merely
inserting carriage returns as necessary to ensure all lines in the selected
region are shorter than specified by the preference 'Fill Column'.  Alpha asks
the user if wrapping should be done whenever the user opens files that have
lines longer than 'Para Column' characters.  This feature can be defeated by
including the word

	nowrap

anywhere on the first line.  You can also disable this feature if you turn on
the Input-Output preference named "Never Wrap On Open".

Preferences: Files

The 'fill' routine goes further.  Not only does it break lines, but it also
coalesces lines to eliminate short lines.  The routine works by stripping the
relevant text of white space, then re-inserting white space and carriage
returns so that no line extends past 'Fill Column' characters in length and
begins with 'Left Fill Column' spaces characters.

The preferences 'Fill Column', 'Para Column', and 'Left Fill Column' can all
be set in the "Prefs > Interface > Text" dialog.

Preferences: Text


	  	 	Fill Paragraph

If there's a selection, then Alpha fills all paragraphs in that selection.  If
not then Alpha fills the paragraph surrounding the cursor.  The definition of
a 'paragraph' may be mode dependent, but in Text mode it is the text between
the closest empty lines.

Fill Paragraph also uses an extra preference 'Double Spaces', which
determines if an extra space after should be placed after the punctuation
mark at the end of each sentence, i.e., after '.', '?', or '!'.  Note that
this also applies when the punctuation mark appears before a closing
parenthesis, bracket, single or double quote, or two single quotes,
according the English typographic usage.

Example:

This a simple sentence.  "The rule applies also for a sentence enclosed
between double quotes."  'As well for single quotes.'  ''Or doubled single
quotes.''  [When it is enclosed between brackets!]  (Or between
parenthesis?)  ("But it does not apply in this case!") As you can see.

The "Prefs > Interface > Text" dialog is used to set this preference.

Preferences: Text


	  	 	Wrap Paragraph

Wrap the paragraph surrounding the cursor.


	  	 	Word Breaking
        
Alpha allows you to redefine its internal notion of what a word is, through
the preference 'Word Break'.  'Word Break' is set to a regular expression that
defines a word to you.

The value of 'Word Break' is mode dependent, as what is meant by a word may be
different for different types of text.  For example, in Text mode the default
definition of 'Word Break' is '\w+'.  This matches any contiguous sequence of
contiguous alphanumeric characters.


	  	Keyboard Shortcuts


Many of Alpha's menu items are bound to specific keys.  In general, keyboard
shortcut icons are given to the right of any menu command.

Alpha includes many keyboard shortcuts that go beyond those found in most
software applications.  Many of them are bound to specific menu items, and are
displayed next to the item's name.  Modifier keys (for the Macintosh) include
"command", "option", "control", and "shift".  As of this writing the option
key is not available for AlphaTk, although "escape" can serve as a meta-key.

Alpha allows you to customize the keystrokes you use to invoke editor
functions.  Any Tcl command (or accented characters) can be bound to any
single keystroke.  See "Keyboard Shortcuts" for more information.


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	International Users
        

Since Alpha is intimately linked with Tcl (and is a programming editor) its
user interface is based on English.  It is unlikely that localization to other
languages will appear.  The most basic keyboard shortcuts in Alpha are
designed to work on most keyboard layouts, but some of the shortcuts are
centric to US/English keyboards.  You can configure Alpha to set up an
alternative slate of shortcuts specifically adapted to your keyboard, in the
package: internationalMenus .


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	Undo + Redo


Alpha supports unlimited undo and redo.  This means that most changes can be
undone, and then redone, at will.  Bear in mind that once you create new
modifications, all changes that you have undone but not redone are lost.
Another point to bear in mind is that saving a buffer to disk flushes the undo
buffer.


	  	Text Wrapping


Line wrapping refers to Alpha automatically inserting line breaks as you
type.  The "Config > Mode Prefs" lets you modify several mode-specific
flags, including the default "Line Wrap" setting.  Each mode decides what
the default line-wrapping regime should be, but you can change this for any
given window using a pop-up menu in the status bar window. (A window specific
setting will remain in effect until that window is closed; the next time that
file is opened it will again assume the mode's default setting.)

	Line Wrap == "Auto"

When 'lineWrap" is set to "Auto" Alpha automatically inserts a Return when a
line becomes too long, respecting the value for the current "Fill Column"
preference.  The "global" value for 'Fill Column' can be changed in the
"Prefs > Interface > Text" dialog,

Preferences: Text

although many modes have their own values which over-ride this "global" one.

Preferences: Mode

At present the "Left Fill Column" preference value is a legacy from earlier
versions, and is ignored by most Alpha routines.  It may be removed entirely
in the future.

	Line Wrap == "None", "Visual-Char", "Visual-Word"

When 'lineWrap' is set to "None" Alpha simply extends text typed in the
current line until the Return key is pressed.  In the case of 
"Visual-Char" or "Visual-Word" long lines will be displayed wrapped onto 
multiple display lines (like a word-processor), but no carriage returns 
will be inserted.  This 'visual' approach is only available in Alphatk 
(not Alpha 8/X).

Note: when the package: autoWrapComments is turned on, text that is typed in
in a commented line will be automatically wrapped even if the current "Line
Wrap" setting is "None".  If you don't like this behavior, you can turn off
"Auto Wrap Comments" globally

Preferences: Electrics

or for any given mode.

Preferences: Mode-Features


	  	Indentation


Alpha can automatically indent the text for you to make it easier to read.
Text can be indented using the "Edit > Indent" menu command.  In addition,
many modes have an "Indent On Return" preference that can be turned on and
off.  When it is turned on, pressing Return will automatically indent the
new line that is created.

Preferences: Mode

Even if this preference is turned off, pressing Command-Return will always
indent the new line, while Control-Return will always insert a new line
without indentation.

How the text is indented is mode dependent.  In programming modes Alpha will
indent blocks of code, like e.g. an if-else statement in C / C++ / Java /
JavaScript etc.

	if (a == 5) {
		b = 5;
	} else {
		b = 17;
	}

How many positions the code is indented is determined by the preference
'Indentation Amount', set in the "Prefs > Interface > Electrics" dialog.  By
default the code is indented 4 positions for each level of indentation.  By '4
positions' here, we mean the code is visually indented by an amount of
whitespace equal to that achieved by pressing the spacebar four times.

Preferences: Electrics

Whether the code will actually be indented by spaces or tabs is dependent on
the tab size, set in the "Prefs > Interface > Appearance" dialog.  By default
the tab size is 8.  Thus with the default setting clearly your code can't be
indented using tabs alone.  'Odd' indents will require a number of tabs plus 4
spaces, and 'Even' indents will be ok with just tabs.

Preferences: Appearance

If you want the code to be indented with spaces only, turn on the pref for
"Indent Using Spaces Only" in the "Prefs > Interface > Electrics" dialog.

Preferences: Electrics

	  	
	======================================================================


This next section ...

deals with Alpha-specific behavior which may be unfamiliar to new users.


	  	User interface details


Alpha's interface has several non-standard features, which are described in
this section.


	  	 	Horizontal scrollbar 


You can remove the horizontal scrollbar from Alpha's windows in order to give
you more real estate.  You can later get the scrollbar back when you need it.
The menu item Toggle Scrollbar in the Window menu inserts/removes the
horizontal scrollbar.  The default for subsequent windows is controlled via
the preference 'Hor Scroll Bar', which you can set using the dialog found in
"Prefs > Interface > Window".

Preferences: Window


	  	 	Dynamic menus


Alpha (but not Alphatk) uses dynamic menus.  This means that some menu items
are changed if you hold down any of the modifier keys.  Usually the Option key
is the one which reveals the hidden menu items, but there are also a few items
which are revealed by holding down the Control or Shift keys.  Try this out by
pulling down the File menu and holding down one of the option, control, or
shift keys.  In Alpha 8 and Alpha X there is an option to disable the use of
dynamic menus (and therefore to show all menu items all of the time).  By
default this option is set to display menus dynamically.

Preferences: Appearance


	  	 	Tear-off menus


Alpha's menus can be torn off from the menubar to make floating palettes of
them.  Clicking on the buttons on the palettes performs the same action as the
corresponding menu item.  Note that dynamic menu items are separated into
several buttons, one for each dynamic item.

If the torn off menu has submenus, there will be pop-up submenus on the
palette.  The submenus can in turn be torn off from the palette (as well as
directly from the menu in the menubar).

If a torn off menu belong to a specific mode, the palette will disappear /
reappear whenever you change from/to that mode.

If you do not want to use tear-off menus, you can disable this feature by
unchecking 'Tearoff Menus' in the "Prefs > Interface > Appearance" dialog.

Preferences: Appearance

(Known bug: Torn off submenus belonging to a specific mode are not hidden
when you change from that mode, only the main menu.)


	  	 	Status bar


The stripe across the bottom of the screen, or just under the menubar is a
floating window which is used to display short messages.  This window is
called the status bar.  Some functions also use it to prompt for input of some
text.  The location of the status bar can be changed by setting the preference
for "Location Of Status Bar".

Preferences: Window

To the right of the status bar there are three menus.

• Wrap menu.  Shows if the lines in the current window are wrapped
  automatically and if the wrapping is soft or not.  See the section below 
  on "# Text Wrapping" for more information about text wrapping.

• File Attributes menu (only in Alpha).  Shows various attributes of the
  current window that can be changed.  What "Mac", "Unix", "IBM", "MPW",
  "Think", and "None" means are explained in the section "# File formats".

"Read only" lets you toggle if the current window can be edited or not.  Note
that a file may be read-only for reasons beyond Alpha's jurisdiction (e.g. it
might reside on a CD-rom or have insufficient write permissions under unix).
Note that when a file is read-only, the Space key scrolls the window down one
page (just like 'more' in unix, and similar to web browser behavior).
Backspace will then scroll the window up one page.

"Show Invisibles" is a toggleable item the determines if invisible characters
are shown or not.  This only affects the active window.  The global Interface
preference named "Show Invisibles" sets the default value for showing
invisible characters.

Preferences: Appearance

"Tab Size: opens a dialog which lets you set the tab size of the active
window, i.e. how many positions a tab uses.

• Encoding menu (only in Alphatk).  Shows the current textual encoding
  of the current window, and allows it to be changed.
 
• Mode menu.  Shows the current mode and allows it to be changed.

Finally, to the very right of the status bar the current line and column are
displayed.  Clicking opens a dialog that allows a specific line to be found.

You can't make the status bar go away.  However, it can be dragged if you use
dialog "Prefs > Interface Prefs > Window" and uncheck the setting for the
'Lock Status' preference.

Preferences: Window

Pressing 'Escape-X' will allow you to enter Tcl code within the status bar,
which will be evaluated by Alpha's Tcl shell when you press Enter/Return.
This allows expert users to perform almost any action.  Note that the status
bar is also used for "# Incremental Searches".


	  	 	Funcs menu


Above the vertical scrollbar on the right is an icon with curly braces ('{}').
This is the so called "Funcs" menu.  The content of this menu is mode
dependent, but for modes for programming languages it usually lists function
definitions of the current window.  In TeX mode it also lists sections and
subsections.  Select a function/item name in the menu to jump to its
definition in the window.  See the package: marks for more information about
'function parsing'.



	  	 	Marks menu


Alpha allows the user to use "marks" to remember positions in files.  Each
mode defines a different marking scheme specific to the type of file that you
are working with.  See the package: marks help for more information.


	  	 	Icons 


Above these pop-up menus is nothing, a red disk icon, or a lock/pencil icon.
The red disk icon indicates that the window is unsaved; clicking on the icon
saves the window.  The lock icon indicates that the window is read-only;
command-clicking toggles the lock icon.  Note, however, that an unsaved window
cannot be made read-only.

In Alphatk the background of this area is normally a neutral gray colour.
However, if the background becomes highlighted (in your standard highlight
colour, usually blue), it means the file (on disk) associated with the current
window appears to have been modified more recently than the window itself.  In
this case you may wish to use "File > Revert" to synchronize the window with
the version on disk.


	  	 	Title bar


Clicking on the window title in Alpha, or Alt/Cmd-clicking in the window in
Alphatk pulls down a pop-up menu showing all containing folders of the
window's file -- or, to put it another way, showing the complete filesystem
path to where this window's file is located.  Selecting an item in this menu
puts up a open dialog in the selected folder.  Selecting an item in the menu
while holding down the shift key opens the folder in the Finder instead of
putting up a file dialog.

Command-Clicking on the title bar anywhere but right on the title pulls downs
the Mark menu.  This is also the case you click on the edges of the window
(only in Alpha8/X).

Tip: In Alpha8, using the sides of the window lets you access a particular
area of the menu quicker as you can Command-click in the approximate location
of the menu item you want to select.
  
Option-Clicking on the title bar brings down a menu in Alpha.  

In Alphatk this menu is accessed from the 'f' menu below the '{}' funcs menu.
Generally speaking this menu should contain files 'related to' the current
window.  The precise content of this menu is mode dependent, and not all modes
will define the contents.  In that case, the menu will contain a list of all
files and folders in the open window's folder.  Selecting a file in the menu
will open it.  Selecting a folder will open the containing folder in the
Finder.  Note that for windows not saved to the disk there will be no menu
with files.

Even if the mode will create a menu when option-clicking the title bar, all
files and folders in the window's folder may be added to the menu.  This
happens if the number of items in the menu created by the mode is less than
what is specified by the preference 'Min Items In Title Popup' which you find
in the dialog "Prefs > Interface Prefs > Window".

Preferences: Window


	  	 	Split-pane bar


Above the vertical scrollbar, right under the Marks menu ('M') is a dark or
black "split-pane" bar.  Double-clicking or dragging the split-pane bar splits
the active window into two separately scrollable panes.  You can also use
the menu item 'Split Window' in the Window menu.  Either pane can be edited,
any changes appear in both panes if they show the same text.  Move from one
pane to the other by clicking in the pane or by typing control-x, then 'o'.
Go back to a single pane by either double-clicking again or dragging the bar
back to the top of the window.


	  	 	Iconified (minimized) windows


You can minimize any open Alpha window using the "OpenWins > Minimize" menu
command or its equivalent keyboard shortcut.  If all windows are minimized
then the most recent window is made visible once again.

In MacClassic (Alpha8), "minimized" windows are presented as small icons,
ordered along the right edge of your screen.

In MacOSX, "minimized" windows are visible in the Dock.

In Windows, "iconified" windows are visible in the OS taskbar.

Checking 'Iconify On Switch' in the "Prefs > Interface > Window" dialog will
make Alpha do the following:

• Iconify all open windows when you switch to another app.
• Expand all windows, which were not iconified before switching from Alpha, 
  when switching back to Alpha.

Preferences: Window

(Yes, we know that this should be renamed "Minimize On Switch" ...


	  	 	Contextual Menu


Alpha provides sophisticated contextual menu support, obtained by pressing the
mouse and the Control key simultaneously (or, in Alphatk, by using the right
mouse button).  This support is based on the context of the mode of the
current window as well as any text surrounding the 'click' position.  You can
customize the menus/items that are presented in the CM, and have a different
set of options for each given mode.  The package: contextualMenu window has
more information.

Note that in split pane windows you cannot use the selection in one pane to
manipulate the text in the other.  Invoking the CM in the alternative (i.e.
non-active) pane should only use the selection/position information that is
found in that pane beneath the current mouse location.


	  	 	Dialogs


A few notes on Alpha's dialogs.  It is conventional in dialogs that 'Tab'
moves to the next field or dialog element, that 'Return' presses the default
button (typically "OK") in the dialog, and that 'Escape' cancels the dialog.

The first two of these can pose problems if you wish to enter a real 'Tab' or
'Return' character into a text field in a dialog.  To avoid this problem,
Alpha specially recognizes 'Option-Tab' and 'Option-Return' and inserts a Tab
or Return as appropriate.

In dialog boxes with checkboxes, a checkbox can be toggled by pressing
"Command-<Letter>", where <Letter> is the first character of the name of the
box that you want to change.

In dialogs without an editable text field, typing the first letter of the name
of a button is equivalent to pressing the button.  For example, you can press
"D" for "Discard Changes" when you try to close a window with unsaved changes.


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	Tiling windows


Alpha provides many different ways to move windows around the screen, most of
which are accessible via the windows menu, i.e the menu with the window icons.
The first four items of the "Windows > Arrange" menu move windows around a
virtual box on the screen, defined by the preferences found in the dialog
"Prefs > Interface Prefs > Tiling".

Preferences: Tiling


	  	 	Vertically

Tiles 'Num Wins To Tile' number of windows vertically.  Preferences which
affects the tiling:

	Tile Top

The position of the upper edge of the top window.

	Def Width

The width of the windows.  (Def Width is set in the Windows preferences
dialog, preferences: Window .)

	Tile Margin

Controls the gap between the windows.

	Tile Height

Determines the height of the windows by the formula

         (Tile Height + (Tile Margin -1))
height = ________________________________
                Num Wins To Tile


	  	 	Horizontally


Tiles 'Num Wins To Tile' number of windows horizontally.  Preferences which
affects the tiling:

	Tile Height

The height of the windows.

	Tile Left

The position of the left edge of the left window.

	Hor Margin

Controls the gap between the windows.

	Tile Width

Determines the width of the windows by the formula

         (Tile Width + (Hor Margin -1))
width = ________________________________
                Num Wins To Tile


	  	 	Unequal Vert and Unequal Hor


Tile two window by splitting the space between them, with the proportion
assigned to the first controlled by 'Tile Proportion'.


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	File formats
        

Alpha can read and write files stored in different formats.  In the dialog for
the menu item 'Save As…' you can specify in which format a file should be
written through the pop-up menus State and Format.


	  	 	State pop-up menu


'State' allows you to specify how much extra information should be saved in
files that you use.

MPW     Window position, current selection, tab sizes, and font 
        information are saved every time you open and close the file.
Think   Tab sizes, and font information are saved every time you open 
        and close the file.
None    No information is saved when you open and close the file.

The state information is saved in the file's resource fork.  It is saved even
if you don't modify the file.  Saving this information does not change the
modification date of the file.

Note that if a given file already has MPW information in it when the file is
open, Alpha will always update that information when the file is closed.  Note
also that marks are always saved in the resource fork whenever a file is
saved, regardless of the 'State'.


	  	 	Format pop-up menu


This menu specifies the way Alpha terminates lines.  This to make it easier to
share files with other platforms as lines are terminated differently on
different platforms.

Mac     Lines end with a carriage return.
Unix    Lines end with linefeed.
DOS     Lines end with both carriage return and linefeed. 

Alpha will automatically read and write all three of these formats.  If you
are not sharing files with other platforms you don't have to worry about the
format and simply you the default Mac format.  Note that if you are going to
be sharing files with a Unix or IBM machine, items in the resource fork will
at best be ignored, so setting the 'State' to 'None' is a reasonable option.

Both the state and format for a file can be change through the File attributes
pop-up menu in the status bar.

In the dialog "Prefs > Interface > Window" the default 'Saved State' can be
changed.

Preferences: Window


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	 	File encodings
        
Tcl 8.1 or newer is completely internationalized, which amongst other things
means it is capable of interacting with files stored in many different
encodings.  The basic ascii characters (0-127) are identical on most
platforms/encodings, but any other characters (accented letters, special
symbols, etc) are encoding-dependent.  If you open a MacOS file containing
these sorts of characters: •, ä, … on another platform, they will probably not
be displayed correctly.  This is because MacOS uses the 'macRoman' encoding,
and other platforms may use 'iso8859-1' (typical unix) or 'cp1252' (windows).

If the Alpha binary contains an 'encoding' pop-up menu in the status bar which
shows the current window's encoding, that can be used to modify that encoding.
If this pop-up is not present, then encodings are not well-supported yet, but
this will hopefully be addressed in future versions.

If the current window has no associated encoding (usually because it is not
associated with a file on disk), then nothing will be shown in the encoding
pop-up.  The action of selecting an item from the pop-up menu depends on the
window's current situation.  There are three possibilities:

If the window doesn't have an encoding, or if the window is not associated
with a file on disk, then the selected encoding is associated with the window
(and will be used as a default if the window is subsequently saved to disk).

If the window is dirty (i.e. has unsaved modifications from the current state
on disk), then again the selected encoding is associated with the window.

If the window is not dirty, and does have a file associated with it on disk,
then the user is asked whether to reread the current file from disk.  If the
user answers 'yes', then the contents of the window are re-read from disk
(like a 'revert' operation), but using the chosen encoding to interpret the
actual bytes which are read.  If the user answers 'no' then Alpha simply
associates the new encoding with the window.

Of course after any of these possibilities, the encoding pop-up will change to
reflect the encoding just selected.

Note that the package: filtersMenu can translate between encodings and do many
other conversions (TeX accents, html accents...)

See the "Unicode and Encodings Help" file for more encoding information.



	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	 	Open file dialog


(This information is only for Alpha8/X at the moment ...)

Alpha's open file dialog <<findFile>> is similar to the dialog in any other
Mac application.  The 'Show' pop-up menu will include options for

	All Readable Documents
	All Text Documents
	All Documents

"All Readable Documents" seems to be the default choice no matter what you
changed this to the last time you opened this dialog.  If you want the default
to be "All Documents", then you can set the "Open All Files" pref in the
"Prefs > Input-Output > Files" dialog.  Note that if you set this, then "All
Documents" will be the _only_ option available to you.  (Technically speaking,
this means not only those with file type 'TEXT'.)

Preferences: Files

The <<findFile>> dialog include two additional checkboxes at the bottom:

	Read only ...

Opens the file as read only.  That a file is read-only file is indicated by a
lock icon in the upper right corner of the window.  Read-only status can be
toggled by command-clicking on the icon.  The default action for 'space' and
'backspace' when a file is read-only is to page forward (closing at the bottom
of the file) or backward.

	Version-Control Aware

See the "Version Control Help" file for more information.


	  	 	Paragraph format


Word processors such as Microsoft Word, AppleWorks, or many mail programs only
put carriage returns at the end of paragraphs, so that they can wrap the
paragraphs on the fly.  This is what is referred to as 'Paragraph Format'.
Alpha does not automatically convert to and from this format because there are
valid reasons why someone might want to edit a paragraph formatted file while
not in paragraph mode.

Therefore, when Alpha opens a paragraph-mode file, it asks the user whether or
not to remap it.  Alpha assumes a file to be in paragraph mode if it contains
any line longer than the value of 'Para Column', which can be set in the
"Prefs > Interface Prefs > Text" dialog.  Files can be mapped back to
paragraph mode by selecting "Text > Paragraph to Line".

Preferences: Text

If you turn on the Input-Output preference named "Never Wrap On Open", then
you will never be asked about "remapping" the file.

Preferences: Files


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	Helper Applications


Alpha uses many helper application, e.g. a web browser and an ftp client.
Using by the menu item "Prefs > Helper Applications".  you can choose which
helpers to use or change.

Preferences: HelperApplications

Now, in some cases a dialog is opened with a pop-up menu with some popular apps
of the appropriate type.  Either choose one from the pop-up menu, or select
'Locate manually' and click OK to locate the app on your disk.

In some cases a file dialog is directly opened to let you locate the helper
app.

	  	 	Unix Issues

If you are running on Unix (either with Alpha X on MacOS X, or Alphatk on any
brand of Unix) or Windows, under some circumstances it may be difficult for
you to locate your helper applications.  This is exacerbated under MacOS X
because the set of disk directories which the system searches for command-line
executables (the 'PATH' environment variable for the technically savvy) is
different for command-line and graphical applications.

What you may need to do is add some paths to the 'Exec Search Path' preference
in the Helper Applications dialog.  To learn which paths you should add, it
can be helpful to go to the command line in the terminal and execute 'which
appname', for example 'which latex'.  This will tell you the full path of that
application.  If you then add the path to AlphaX/tk's preferences it will be
able to find the application directly.  Another approach is to type, manually,
in the file-selection dialog, the prefix of the hidden path "/usr/local" for
example, and then it will be possible to explore within it.


	  	Spell Checking


See help for the package: spellcheck .


	  	Command-clicking


Command-Clicking on any text causes Alpha to try find a URL anywhere near
where you click.  If Alpha finds one it sends it to Internet Config which
passes it to the right helper application.  For example, place the mouse over
this text and command-click:

	http://www.purl.org/net/alpha/wiki/


	  	Command-Double-Clicking


Command-Double-Clicking on a word activates a mode specific function which
uses the word you clicked on as input.  In several programming modes, Alpha
tries to find the definition of the word you clicked on.  Some examples:

In HTML mode, if you Command-Double-Click on a valid tag, a dialog will appear 
offering all possible options for that tag.

Experiment in the "HTML-Example.html" window.

In Tcl mode, if you Command-Double-Click on a variable Alpha displays its
value, if you click on a command Alpha tries to look it up first in the Tcl
folders, then in "Alpha Commands", and then finally in "Tcl 8.4 Commands".

Experiment in the "Tcl-Example.tcl" window.

Consult the documentation for the mode in question to see if there is some
special routine associated with Command-Double-Click.


	  	Search and Replace
        

Alpha has a full repertoire of searching commands.  Consult the help window
for the package: supersearch which implements Alpha's 'Find' dialog, as well
as several other items in the "Search" menu.  It allows single / multi-file /
regexp / batch / word-match / search / replace / replace-all / in-selection
(whew!)  operations from the same dialog box.


	  	 	Incremental Searches


Incremental searches bypass the normal search dialog and search for the
current text after each keystroke.  The result is often much faster and less
intrusive.  The "Search > Quick Find" and "Search > Reverse Quick Find" menu
items are the forward and backward incremental searches respectively.  More
help can be found in the package: incrementalSearch window.


	  	 	Browser Windows


Browser windows are used to list the result of batch searches, as well as
other similar lists.  Each line in the browser window refer to a certain line
in a file, in the case of batch searches the lines where what you searched for
have been found.  Navigate the windows using the up and down arrows, and jump
to the match - i.e. the line in the file referred to by the line in the
browser window - by hitting 'return'.

See help for the package: Brws for more information.

	  	
	======================================================================


This next section deals with ...


"Modes" and "Installed Packages" contained in the AlphaTcl library.


	  	Modes


Alpha is made for editing text of many different kinds.  Therefore Alpha can
switch between many different modes.  When Alpha switches between the modes
some of Alpha's functionality changes to better help you to write the
particular kind of text you are editing.  For example C++ mode is used to
edit code in the C++ programming language, and HTML mode is used for editing
web pages.  Alpha comes with more than 25 modes, most of them being modes for
different programming languages.  The default mode is called Text mode and is
used for editing plain text, like this manual for example.  Alpha also
switches to Text mode when you open a new untitled window.  See the file
"Installed Packages" for a complete list of them and for links for help for
each of them.  This section is only a general discussion about modes.

Simple examples of functionality which changes between the modes are:

• Coloring of the text.  Programming language all have special keywords.
Alpha colors these keywords to make the code easier to read, and these words
are naturally different in different programming languages.

• Alpha indents the code to make it easier to read.  This is also naturally
done differently for different programming languages.

Most modes also add functionality to Alpha, functionality which is not
available for the basic Text mode.  Some modes also have there own menu(s)
which are inserted in the menu bar when switches to the mode in question.
This menu(s) are removed again when Alpha leaves the mode.  Some simple
examples of extra functionality in different modes:

• In C++ mode Alpha can help you to quickly type certain language constructs,
such as for loops.

• In HTML mode there is a function to create a link between two web pages.

It is important to know that Alpha has both global menus and functionality,
which are always there regardless of the mode, and mode specific menus and
functionality, which are only there when Alpha is in a specific mode.  For
instance, the menus from File to Config and the Window menu (the one with the
three windows icon) are global menus.

	  	 	Initial Mode Selection

When you open a file Alpha always chooses a mode for it.  Alpha does its best
to choose the mode you want.  Therefore it is important to know how Alpha
chooses the mode.  The following is considered, in this order:

	File Creator (on MacOS and MacOS X only)

In some cases Alpha can choose the mode depending on which application has
created the file.  For example, files created by MacPerl (with the "McPl"
creator code) are opened in Perl mode, while those created by "Ramses" (RAMS)
open in M2 mode.  Click here <<showVarValue modeCreator>> to see the current
"Creator Code -> Mode" mappings.

	Unix executable lines

If the first non-empty line reads "#!/dir/subdir/command ..."  then Alpha
tries to find a mode corresponding to 'command'.  This kind of line is used
in unix files.  For example, files that include this

    #!/dir/maple

will open in "mapl" mode.  Click here <<showVarValue unixMode>> to see the
current "Unix Executable -> Mode" mappings.

	'Smart' mode lines

If the first non-empty line contains a string

    -*-Mode: <mode>-*-

or

    -*-<mode>-*-

(usually preceded by comment characters) then Alpha switches to the mode
<mode>.  For example, if the first non-empty line contains

    <!-- -*-HTML-*- -->

then Alpha opens this file in HTML mode.

	Suffix Mappings

The suffix in the file name is the last item checked if none of the above
tests determined a mode for the file.  For example, 'file.py' is opened in
Pyth mode because of the '.py' suffix, 'file.html' is opened in HTML mode
because of the '.html' suffix.  You can view and edit the suffix mapping
via the menu item "Config > Global Setup > Suffix Mappings".  In this
dialog the suffixes for each mode is specified as a list of glob-style file
patterns.  For example, the wildcard * matches any string of characters,
while ?  matches any single character.  As an example, for Perl mode the
default patterns are: *.pl *.ph *.pm meaning that any file with a name
ending by '.pl', '.ph', or '.pm' will be opened in Perl mode.  Uppercase
equivalent suffixes are automatcally recognized too, so it is not necessary
(or recommended) to specify these separately.  (The precise rule is that
case sensitive matches take precedence over case-insensitive ones, so it is
possible for example to map '*.c' to C mode and '*.C' to C++ mode, as it is
custom on certain unix systems.)  (Note that despite the name 'suffix
mapping', in fact any glob pattern is respected.  For example, one could
map '*htm*' to HTML mode, thus matching also files like 'test.html.bak5'.)

Preferences: SuffixMappings

If all of these tests fail the window will open in standard "Text" mode.

	  	 	Changing Active Window Modes

Once a mode has been selected for a window (either by Alpha or by you), it is
'remembered' when you switch amongst your active windows.  You can change the
mode for a window 'manually' in two ways:

(1) By selecting one in the "Modes" pop-up menu, the rightmost of the three
menus in the status bar.

(2) By selecting the menu item "Config > Mode Prefs> Change Mode".  

When you change the mode of an active window 'manually', it is remembered so
long as the window remains open.  When you close it and re-open it, the
default mode will again be determined using the methods described above.


	  	Alpha's Preferences


Alpha stores most preferences in the "defs.tcl" and "arrdefs.tcl" files in an
application specific Preferences Folder.

	  	 	Default Prefs Folder

The preferences folder is named "Alpha-v8" for versions 8.x of your Alpha
binary, and will be named "Alpha-v9/10/etc" for future versions.

Alpha8 creates this Preferences Folder as 

	:System:Preferences:Alpha-v8: 

AlphaX creates this preferences folder as 

	~/Library/Preferences/Alpha-v8/ 

Alphatk (MacOS X) creates this preferences folder as 

	~/Library/Preferences/Alphatk-v8/ 

Alphatk (Unix) creates this preferences folder as 

	~/.Alpha-v8/ 

Alphatk (Windows) creates this preferences folder as 

	$env(USER_PROFILE)/Alpha-v8/ 

(or if that doesn't exist, then in the same place as on Unix). 

	  	 	User-Defined Prefs Folder

If you create a folder named "AlphaPrefs" and place it at the same level of
the Alpha application, this folder will be used preferentially.  This will
allow you to maintain two or more separate versions of Alpha without
rebuilding indices each time that you switch back and forth amongst them.

If you do maintain multiple AlphaPrefs folders, note that saved preferences
will not be shared amongst your Alpha applications.

	  	 	Upgrading from 7.x

If you are upgrading to Alpha 8.x from 7.x, some of your old preferences will
be incompatible/irrelevant to the new Alpha version.  Therefore you shouldn't
just copy the two prefs files from one folder to the other.

Here's how to copy over just a few preferences from earlier versions: open the
old 'defs.tcl' or 'arrdefs.tcl' and examine them for lines you wish to copy.
Open the new "defs.tcl" and "arrdefs.tcl".  Alpha opens them in read-only
mode, but you can command-click on the 'lock' icon in the window to make the
windows modifiable.  Now copy and paste as you desire.  Finally save the
windows and quit and restart Alpha.  If you get an error on startup, you
probably copied over incompatible preferences and you'll have to delete the
files and start over (hence it may be a good idea to make a backup copy of the
originals before you start).


	  	 	Global and mode preferences


Alpha has two types or preferences, global and mode preferences.

• Global preferences always apply regardless of the mode.  These are set in
the various dialogs "Config > Preferences".

• Mode preferences only apply to windows in that mode, and are set in the
dialog "Config > Mode Prefs > Preferences".  Some modes may also have other
means of setting preferences.  Note that in some cases there are mode
preferences which coincide with a global preference.  In this case the mode
preference override the global one.

The is also another way of customizing Alpha than setting preferences in these
dialogs.  That is using preferences files where you add your own Tcl code.
There is both a global preferences file, which can be opened / created using
"Config > Preferences > Edit Prefs File" and a mode specific one created using
"Config > Mode Prefs > Edit Prefs File".

To learn about writing your own Tcl code for Alpha, see the section below on
"# Changing Alpha's behavior".


	  	 	Coloring
        

Alpha supports automatic coloring of the text.  The way Alpha colors the text
depends on the current mode.  See the package: colorPrefs for more
information.


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	Packages


Alpha has a very flexible mechanism for adding extra functionality.  Much of
Alpha's functionality has been bundled into a number of so called packages.
This has two main advantages.  First, the user can choose to activate only
those packages he or she wants and totally ignore the other ones.  Second,
anybody can write and distribute new packages for Alpha.

Alpha comes with a large number of packages.  The remainder of this section
describes some of them, but you can also see the file "Installed Packages"
for a complete list which includes links for package specific help files.

The menu item "Config > Packages > Read Help For A Package" will also give
information about specific packages.  To learn how to install new packages see
the section below on "# Installing New Packages".

The packages come in three flavors:

• Modes. As have been discussed in the previous section, a mode gives Alpha 
  some functionality useful for editing text for a particular purpose, for 
  example writing code in various programming languages.

• Menus. A menu is a package which attaches an extra menu to the menu bar.

• Features. A feature gives you some more functionality without attaching a 
  menu to the menu bar. However, some features adds a new submenu to a menu 
  or some new menu items to a menu.

In practice the only difference between 'menus' and 'features' is that 'menus'
have their own menus in the menu bar.


Menus and features can be activated and deactivated either globally using the
menu items

    "Config > Global Setup > Menus"
    "Config > Global Setup > Features"

Preferences: Menus
Preferences: Features

or they can be adjusted for the mode of the current window using

	"Config > Mode Prefs > Menus"
	"Config > Mode Prefs > Features"

Preferences: Mode-Menus
Preferences: Mode-Features

Some 'packages' are also enabled through "Interface" or "Input-Output"
preferences under the "Config > Preferences" menu, although in this case they
will just look like a 'normal' checkbox preference.  (This distinction really
doesn't matter much for most users ...)

To turn off a globally active preference for a specific mode, use the menu
item "Config > Mode Prefs > Features" dialog.  (See the dialog pane for "Turn
Items Off".)


	  	Menus and Features


Activating a menu or feature makes the functionality provided by the menu or
feature available until it is deactivated.  Alpha remembers which ones are
active next time you run Alpha.  Once a menu or feature is deactivated it does
not affect Alpha's behavior at all.  It is then as if it did not exist.  Note,
however, that in some cases you the package is not deactivated until you
restart Alpha.

The preferences: Menus dialog is divided into two sections, the first
reserved for menus designed to be active globally, the second supporting
functions for specific modes.  Normally it is a good idea to only choose
between the menus in the section 'Usual menus'.  Although it is possible to
activate the other menus globally, they are usually of no use outside the
mode or modes they are designed for.  See the "Installed Packages" file for
the current list of menus available.

The preferences: Features dialog is similarly divided into two sections, for
features that are designed to be used globally, and for "Other Possible
Features" which are designed to be used in a specific mode or modes.

Also in this case it usually only make sense to choose between the ones in
the section 'Usual features'.  See the "Installed Packages" file for the
current list of features available.


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	Electrics - automatic typing by Alpha
        

The term "electric" is used in the sense of "automatic, power assisted
behavior", which is intended to save time, keystrokes, and brainpower.  All
the "electric" features are features, which makes Alpha do automatic typing
for you.  The exact behavior is mode dependent.


	  	 	Electric completions


Enabling the 'Elec Completions' feature gives you a set of features to save
you key strokes.  When you invoke it Alpha tries to expand what you have just
typed to give the rest of what you want.  Electric completion is invoked by
the 'Complete' key specified in the "Config > Special Keys" dialog.

Preferences: SpecialKeys

See the "Electrics Help" file for more information.


	  	 	Electric expansions


Enabling the 'Elec Expansions' feature provides you with a special kind of
word completion.  When you find yourself typing a lot of variable and function
names over and over, and these names are word-combinations where the name is
formed by either capitalizing each word or separating them with an underscore,
just type the initial letter of each word and invoke electric expansion
instead.  This is often shorter and more natural than typing a few letter and
using electric completions to make a word completion.  Electric expansion is
invoked by typing command-space.

See help for the package: elecExpansions for more information.


	  	 	Special keys dialog


The dialog "Config > Special Keys" is used to define the keys which activate
the electric completion and expansion functions and which let you jump between
the template stops.  See the package: elecBindings help window for more
information about the function to which you can bind keypresses for different
'electric' behavior, or set your preferences: specialKeys to change the
keyboard shortcuts for your various 'electric' operations.  These shortcuts
are saved between editing sessions.

	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	Regular Expressions


Many packages use Regular Expressions in their procedures.  While it isn't
necessary to know anything about Regular Expressions (commonly referred to as
"regexps") in order to use Alpha, they provide a very powerful method for
searching for any number of textual variations within a document.  See the
"Regular Expressions" help file for more information.  Regular Expression 
searching is available in the <<find>> dialog.


	----------------------------------------------------------------------


	  	File Patterns
        

Some functions require that you give a file pattern which specifies a set of
file names, e.g. if you want to change the suffix mappings you must give a
pattern specifying which files should be opened in a certain mode, and as
another example if you want to create a fileset you must give a pattern
specifying which files should belong in the fileset.

A file pattern is given as a string including special characters, which allow
automatic substitution of characters in file names.

    ?           Matches any single character.

    *           Matches any sequence of zero or more characters.

    [chars]     Matches any single character in chars. If chars contains a 
                sequence of the form a-b then any character between a and b 
                (inclusive) will match. To match '-' give it as the first 
                character between the brackets.

    \x          Matches the character x. This is useful if you want to 
                match any of the special characters, e.g to matching '*' is 
                done by the pattern '\*'.
    
    {a,b,...}   Matches any of the strings a, b, etc.

Some examples of how to use file patterns:

• To match any file ending by '.c' use the pattern '*.c'.  This will match
files with names like 'blah.c' 'bladdity.c' 'gghjcdhj.c'.

• To match any file ending by '.c' or '.h' use the pattern '*.{c,h}'.  This
will match files with names like 'blah.c' 'blah.h' 'bladdity.c' 'bladdity.h'.

• Lets say you have files with names 'chapter1.tex', 'chapter2.tex' through
'chapter50.tex'.  To match the first 9 chapters you could use the pattern
'chapter?.tex' This will match the files 'chapter1.tex' through
'chapter9.tex'.  Another pattern which would match the same files is
'chapter[1-9].tex'.

• To match the files 'chapter1.tex' through 'chapter9.tex' and simultaneously
files 'chapter1.log' through 'chapter9.log' you can use the pattern
'chapter[1-9].{tex,log}'

A technical point to raise here is that the {a,b,...} style patterns are 
only supported where 'glob style' matching is used.  In many cases, for
example the 'Suffix Mappings' dialog, standard string matching is used,
in which case the {a,b,...} style patterns are not supported.  This
is typically because in such cases you are allowed to enter a list of
patterns, which can be used to achieve the same aim.
        

	  	Marks


Alpha allows the user to use "marks" to remember positions in files.  Marks
"float".  That is, if a mark is initially at position 312 and then five
characters are inserted at location 297, the mark's new value will be 317.
Alpha uses three different types of marks.  The are several different types of
marks available, see the package: marks for more information about permanent,
named marks, the window pin, bookmarks, and the Funcs Menu.


	  	File Comparison


With Alpha you can compare files and display the differences in them.  Among
other things, this allows you to easily pinpoint what has changed between two
different versions of the same file.  The "Utils > Compare" menu items allow
you to either compare the two topmost windows, or two arbitrary files or two
entire folders.  In the case of two folders each pair of files with identical
names in the two folders are compared.  It is also indicated which files are
only found in one of the folders.

The comparison is done using a port of the unix GNU diff program, or whichever
helper you have selected for the Diff service.

Alpha opens the two files in windows at the top of the screen with the diff
file at the bottom.  You can navigate between individual differences in the
diff file by using the Up and Down arrows.  The section of the files which
differ are then selected in the two files.

This section has only been a short introduction to the use of file comparison
with Alpha.  Read more in the file "Diff Help".


	  	Backups


Alpha can automatically make a backup copy for you of the old version of a
file whenever you save changes.  This is done if you check 'Backup' in the
preferences dialog "Prefs > Input-Output > Backups".  See the help for the
package: backup for more information.

Preferences: Backups


	  	 	Auto saving


Alpha can automatically save the documents for you after a certain number of
changes.  This is done if you check 'Auto Save' in the preferences dialog
"Prefs > Input-Output > Backups".  Alpha then saves the documents every
'Changes Lim' changes.  'Changes Lim' can be set in the same preferences
dialog.  Note that Untitled windows are not autosaved.

Preferences: Backups


	  	Tags

Alpha supports the use of tags to find declarations of functions.  See the
package: tags help window for more information.  You will need to
activate this package to make use of this functionality (like the tools
'ctags' and 'etags' if you are familiar with them).

Preferences: tags


	  	Calculator


Alpha has its own calculator.  This is just a quick-and-dirty RPN stack
calculator, which works on both signed and unsigned decimals, hex integers,
and floating point.  See the "Calculator Help" file for more information.


	======================================================================


	  	Unicode and Encodings


Alphatk and Alpha 8 make use of Tcl's built in support for unicode, Utf-8, and
in general any well-defined character encoding, including platform dependent
encodings such as 'macRoman'.

See <http://www.unicode.org> for a general introduction to unicode.


	  	  Editing files with various encodings


Any text file whose first line contains text of the form '(encoding:xxx)' will
have its characters read in the encoding 'xxx' when Alpha(tk) tries to edit
the file, and similarly when the file is saved.  However some encodings, such
as unicode itself, may use multiple bytes to represent a single character, and
in this cases Alpha(tk) may not recognise the existence of a string such as
'(encoding:xxx)' even if it is given!  This is only normally a problem with
the unicode encoding, but fortunately it can be solved in a different way:
unicode files always begin with the (hexadecimal) sequence 'fffe' or 'feff'.
Alpha(tk) will automatically recognise this, read the rest of the file in
binary form, and treat it as unicode using the appropriate byte-ordering for
the file (this is an additional complication: some platforms save the high
byte first, others the low byte!).  When saving unicode files, Alpha(tk)
currently only saves using the byte-ordering of the host platform.

You can check a window's encoding with

	getWinInfo ?-w win?  arr

and then look at $arr(encoding), or directly with

	win::Encoding ?win?

Note: Alpha 8 probably does not necessarily support all of the above at
present.  It should all work in Alphatk however.

For example, the current encoding of this window can be seen by clicking here:
<<alertnote [win::Encoding]>>


	  	  Saving in different encodings


When you save a window, Alpha will save it using the encoding currently set
for that window (as shown in the popup encodings menu in the status bar, or as
available through 'getWinInfo' or 'win::Encoding').  However, if the location
to which you are saving has a different default encoding specified, Alpha will
ask you which encoding you will like to use.


	  	  Specifying encodings


There are various other ways in which you may specify the encoding Alpha(tk)
should use for a file:

(1) You can set the default encoding for new files in the International
preferences dialog.

(2) A mode can have a default encoding.  For example you could add the
following to your prefs.tcl:

	newPref variable defaultEncoding iso8859-1 TeX
	newPref variable defaultEncoding iso8859-1 Bib
	newPref variable defaultEncoding iso8859-1 HTML
	newPref variable defaultEncoding utf-8 C
	newPref variable defaultEncoding utf-8 C++

(3) The 'Fileset Encoding Preference' feature (turn it on in by selecting
'Config > Global Setup > Features') can be used to declare a default encoding
for any fileset.

Preferences: Features

Then choose 'Edit A Fileset...'  <<editAFileset>> and for the fileset you
want, click on the 'Attach/detach Info' button, and then click the checkbox by
'Encoding' to indicate you want to attach some encoding information to the
given fileset, followed by 'OK'.  You will now need to cancel the main dialog
and re-select 'Edit A Fileset' where you will now have the opportunity to pick
an encoding.

(4) The popup 'encoding' menu (once a file is open, there is a popup menu in
the status bar which you can use to select a new encoding to use for the
file).  If you change the encoding, Alpha(tk) will offer an option to re-read
the file from disk using the new encoding.

(5) You can place a command:

	alpha::registerEncodingFor path encoding

in your "prefs.tcl", where 'path' is, say, '/home/Users/me' and encoding is
'macRoman' or 'iso8859-1'.  (The 'encoding names' command will give you the
list of acceptable encodings).


	  	  Sourcing files


Alpha(tk) provides some support for sourcing of files in general encodings.
Tcl itself (before version 8.5) lacks this support in the 'source' command, 
but it can be emulated. The proc: alpha::registerEncodingFor must be used 
for this purpose.

	
	======================================================================

	  	The Command Line
	
MacOS X (for Alpha X or Alphatk), and any Unix/Windows system (for
Alphatk) all make use of a command-line.  It is therefore important to be
able to use the command-line to ask Alpha X/tk to edit files.  In
addition, it is useful to be able to 'pipe' information to or from Alpha.
This section of the manual presents Alpha's support for the command-line.
Alpha 7 and Alpha 8, being classic MacOS based, have no need to deal with
the command-line, since no such thing exists on the classic MacOS
platform.

We should point out that command-line support is a new feature of Alpha (as of
May 2003), and may therefore not be as well tested as other aspects of the
editor.

	  	 	AlphaX/Alphatk support

The package: alphaServer enables command line interaction in MaxOS X.

For both AlphaX and Alphatk on MacOS X, one can use the scripts 'alphac' or
'alphae' (which are located in Alpha's Tools directory) as commands for use in
the terminal.  For example:

	> alphac my_file.txt

will open the given file inside Alpha X/tk.  You must make sure that 'alphac'
has executable permissions, of course.  The way this works is that 'alphac'
communicates with Alpha X/tk and sends it the relevant information so that the
file is opened for editing.  Alphatk (but not AlphaX) also supports using the
application itself in this role directly (i.e. one can replace uses of
'alphac' with direct uses of Alphatk itself).

	  	 	Alphatk support

This section holds for standalone executable versions of Alphatk.  On Windows,
the executable (and therefore the name to use on the command-line) is
'alphatk.exe', on MacOS X it is 'Alphatk' (which is located in
'Alphatk.app/Contents/MacOS/Alphatk').  These executables can be used as
follows:

	> alphatk.exe my_file.txt

or

	> alphatk.exe file_one.txt file_two.txt file_three.txt

etc.  If you wish to open a particular line of a particular file, it can be
preceded by '+<linenum>', for example:

	> alphatk.exe +200 my_file.txt

If you want to open a file called '+<linenum>', then you must precede the
options with '--', after which Alphatk will not interpret any command line
entries in any special way, for example:

	> alphatk.exe +10 file1 -- +20 file2

will attempt to open 'file1' at line 10, and attempt to open two more files
called '+20' and 'file2'.  By using 'alphatk.exe -- --' one can even open a
file called '--', if desired!

For more sophisticated selecting of lines, one can use any pattern matching
the regular expression "+(from(.index)?)([-,](to(.index)?))?", for example:

	+10,20        -- selects from lines 10 to 20 inclusive
	+10.2         -- selects from line 10, character 2 to end of line
	+10.2,13      -- selects from line 10, character 2 to end of line 13
	                 (can also use +10.2-13)
	+10,13.5      -- selects from line 10 to character 5 in line 13

Opening a new window.  Use the '-c' flag:

	> alphatk.exe -c myNewWindow

to open a new window (not associated with a file on disk) with a particular
name.

Alphatk also always attempts to check whether it is already running, and if it
is already running, a new process will not be created, rather the instructions
on files to open will be passed to the already running application.

To pipe stdin of one process to Alphatk, use a pipe and '-' as the argument to
Alphatk, for example (this will place the results of 'ls -l' in a new,
untitled window in Alphatk):

	> ls -l | alphatk.exe -

In all situations, a single '-' causes Alphatk to attempt to read the standard
input and place it in a new window.  Currently Alphatk will always attempt to
read the entire stdin in one go.


	  	Using Alpha as a Helper Application

Alpha can be used as a helper application for other programs.  For example,
Interarchy and Fetch can use Alpha as their "ftp-editor", allowing you to
choose files from their listing windows, open and edit them with Alpha, and
then save them back to their remote location.  See the help window for the
package: ODBEditor for more information.

The "Frontier Help # Opening a Frontier text window in Alpha" help file
section describes how to edit Frontier files using Alpha.

You can also specify Alpha as the "View Source" application for Netscape, as
the file-capture reader for MacClassic telnet programs ...


	======================================================================


This last major section of the Alpha Manual ...

concerns upgrading or otherwise enhancing Alpha, either by installing new
packages written by various Alpha users and developers, or by writing your own
packages.


	  	Installing New Packages
        

	  	 	Where to find new packages


Currently the best place to look for new packages is 

    <ftp://ftp.ucsd.edu/pub/alpha/>.

For those from Europe, you may wish to try the mirror: 

    <ftp://anu.theologie.uni-halle.de/comp/mac/Alpha>


	  	 	What is already installed?


It is obviously a waste of time to install something which is already
installed or - worse - to install an old package replacing a more recent
version.  The "Installed Packages" help file lists all packages which are
installed.  The list contains the package names, versions, and maintainers.
This file can be updated at any time with the "Config > List Packages" menu
item.

This file lists the version number for every installed package.  Make a sure
the version number of the package you intend to install is higher than the one
for the currently installed package.


	  	 	Installing


How to start the installation depends on if the package you are about to
install is accompanied by a file 'READ ME TO INSTALL' (or similar) or is just
a single file someName.tcl.

• If there is a file 'READ ME TO INSTALL', open it (hence the name!).  All
packages built up of more than one file must actually have such a read me file
in order to be possible to install.  If there is a file installScript.tcl (or
similar), don't open it.  It only contains instructions to Alpha what to
install.

• If there is only a single file someName.tcl, open it.  Some single file
package are configured to automatically close themselves and open a
installation dialog.  Otherwise proceed as below.

If there are instructions in the read me file how to install the package,
follow them (of course!).  In other cases this is how a typical installation
is made.

• After you have open the read me file or the single someName.tcl, make sure
Alpha has inserted a menu 'Install' in the menu bar.  This means Alpha is in
installation mode.  If not, you can manually switch to installation mode by
selecting 'Inst' in the mode pop-up menu in the statusbar.

• Select 'Install > Install This Package' from the Install menu.

• An installation dialog is now opened.  Here you can choose to make an Easy
Install or a Custom Install.  The Custom Install lets you choose exactly what
to install.  The Easy Install installs everything.  If you are not sure which
files you need use the Easy Install.

• There are also three options in the installation dialog.

If 'Backup removed files' is checked Alpha will save any removed file in a
folder InstallationBackup in Alpha's folder.  This as a safety measure so you
can recover any changes you may have made to them or so you can switch back to
them if the newly installed package doesn't work as you wish.

If 'Show installation log' is checked a window is opened after installation
showing which files have been put where and which files have been deleted.

If 'Force overwrite, even of newer files' is checked then newer existing files
will be replaced by those you are about to install.

After Alpha has put the files in there correct location Alpha rebuilds its
index files.  This make take a little while.  The index files are used by
Alpha to keep track of where the various packages and function are.

After the installation is completed you must quit and restart Alpha.


	  	 	If something goes wrong


What to do if you're unlucky and have installed a package which simply doesn't
work, possibly crashing Alpha when it's launched?  The obvious thing is then
to uninstall the package.  If Alpha can be launched with the new package
installed you can uninstalling it using the method in the next section.

If the newly installed package causes Alpha to crash when you launch it, the
situation is more problematic.  Then you have to manually delete some files to
make Alpha run again.  First delete the files you've just installed.  During
the installation the package's files are copied to various locations in the
folder "Tcl" inside Alpha's folder.  Locate and delete the ones with the same
names as the ones in the set of files you installed.  Then before you launch
Alpha again you have to delete a folder from Alpha's preferences folder.
Alpha's preferences folder is called "Alpha-v7" and is located in the
Preferences folder in the system folder.  Delete the folder "Cache" inside
"Alpha-v7".  Deleting the folder "Cache" is harmless.  It will be re-created
the next time you launch Alpha.  It is very likely, though, that the old
content was causing Alpha to crash.

If this doesn't help, as a last way out try removing the complete "Alpha-v8"
from the Preferences folder.


	  	Uninstalling Packages


Many packages support a mechanism for uninstalling them.  Please note before
starting to uninstall packages you think you won't ever need that the only
thing you save by uninstalling a package is disk space - unless you have
installed some buggy package causing obvious problems.  Installed packages
which are not in use, i.e. either not enabled through the dialogs 'Config >
Global Setup > Menus' / 'Config > Global Setup > Features', or modes which are
not used, are never loaded into Alpha's memory.  Thus you do not save any
memory by uninstalling packages.  Thus if you have plenty of disk space, there
is hardly any point in uninstalling anything.

The menu item "Config > Packages > Uninstall Some Packages" uninstalls
packages.  Select the package you want to uninstall from the pop-up menu in the
dialog.  All files belonging to the package are now permanently deleted.  Only
a reinstallation will restore the package.

After the uninstallation you must restart Alpha.

If you can't find the package you want to uninstall in the pop-up menu, it
means that the package doesn't support the mechanism for automatic
uninstallation.  In this case the only way uninstall the package is to
manually find the files belonging to the package and delete them.  Don't use
this method unless you know what you are doing.  Deleting the wrong files may
result in all sorts of troubles.


	  	User Defined Keyboard Shortcuts


Alpha allows you to customize the keystrokes you use to invoke editor
functions.  Any Tcl command can be bound to any single keystroke.  Keyboard
shortcuts can be stored in a global "prefs.tcl" file, or if they are mode
specific, in a <mode>Prefs.tcl file.  The first item is available under the
menu item "Config > Preferences > Edit Prefs File".  This file will be sourced
upon every restart of Alpha.  The second type of prefs file, for individual
modes, can be created/opened for the mode of the current window using the
"Config > Mode Prefs > Edit Prefs File".  This file is sourced _after_ the
mode has been initialized, so any code contained in such a file will over-ride
what is supplied in AlphaTcl.

Please see the help file "Keyboard Shortcuts" for more information.


	  	Changing Alpha's behavior
        

The rest of the manual points you in the right direction to customize Alpha
even more, by writing some of your own Tcl code.

First of all, where do you put your own Tcl code so that Alpha can find it?
Alpha has a set of preferences files for this purpose.  There is one global
preferences file ("prefs.tcl") which is loaded when Alpha is launched.  In
this file you should put code which should be loaded regardless of which mode
you're working in.  This preferences file is opened / created using the menu
item "Config > Preferences > Edit Prefs File".

Then there is one preferences file for each mode.  The file for a mode is
loaded after as the last code to be loaded when a mode is used the first time.
This preferences file can be opened /created using the menu item "Config >
Mode Prefs > Edit Prefs File".

These preferences files are intended for code for personal use.  It is also
possible to write a completely new package for Alpha, which others can also
use.

To learn about all of these topics, read the file "Extending Alpha".
        

	  	AlphaTcl-Developers mailing list
        

PLEASE use the alphatcl-developers mailing lists to discuss problems,
suggestions etc with this release.  See the subscription options available at

    <http://www.purl.org/net/alpha/mail>

There are a number of known bugs which will hopefully be corrected in a
future release.  PLEASE read the "Known Bugs" file for a list of known bugs,
and for how to give an informative bug report, without which it is unlikely
any bug you found can be fixed.
        

	======================================================================


	  	Acknowledgments


The binary part of Alpha was originally written by Pete Keleher, and it is
being maintained by the Alpha Cabal, a small group of Alpha users who took
over when Pete stopped his Alpha activity.

Pete's original acknowledgements: 

    Alpha contains source from many places, but in particular I'm grateful to
    Ray Johnson and Tim Endres for their working on porting Tcl to the mac,
    and to Tom Scavo and Tom Pollard for their Tcl code contributions.  The
    following people have also provided considerable code and/or help
    debugging the one or two bugs Alpha has had: Masatsugu Nagata, Karl J.
    Smith, Eric Sink, David C. Black, Richard T. Austin, Henry Spencer, Vince
    Darley, Johan Linde, Tom Fetherston, Jon Guyer and Jerry Fowler.

The AlphaTcl library is also based on work of Pete, but it is now an open
source project hosted on SourceForge.  Please see the "Changes - AlphaTcl" for
a proper list of acknowledgments.


	  	Copyright, Credits


Author: Peter Keleher

<http://www.purl.org/net/alpha/keleher>

Contributors: This manual has been updated / revised by many helpful users
and developers over the years, as noted above.
